Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1601
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-1601 to 85-1658 shall be known and may be cited as the Private Postsecondary Career School Act.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 51;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2801;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 1.